Utah statutes.
16-10a-1330.   Judicial appraisal of shares -- Court action.
(1)  If a demand for payment under Section 16-10a-1328 remains unresolved, the
corporation shall commence a proceeding within 60 days after receiving the
payment demand contemplated by Section 16-10a-1328, and petition the court to
determine the fair value of the shares and the amount of interest.  If the
corporation does not commence the proceeding within the 60-day period, it
shall pay each dissenter whose demand remains unresolved the amount demanded.
(2)  The corporation shall commence the proceeding described in Subsection (1)
in the district court of the county in this state where the corporation's
principal office, or if it has no principal office in this state, Salt Lake
County.  If the corporation is a foreign corporation, it shall commence the
proceeding in the county in this state where the principal office of the
domestic corporation merged with, or whose shares were acquired by, the
foreign corporation was located, or, if the domestic corporation did not have
its principal office in this state at the time of the transaction, in Salt
Lake County.
(3)  The corporation shall make all dissenters who have satisfied the
requirements of Sections 16-10a-1321, 16-10a-1323, and 16-10a-1328, whether or
not they are residents of this state whose demands remain unresolved, parties
to the proceeding commenced under Subsection (2) as an action against their
shares. All such dissenters who are named as parties shall be served with a
copy of the petition.  Service on each dissenter may be by registered or
certified mail to the address stated in his payment demand made pursuant to
Section 16-10a-1328.  If no address is stated in the payment demand, service
may be made at the address stated in the payment demand given pursuant to
Section 16-10a-1323.  If no address is stated in the payment demand, service
may be made at the address shown on the corporation's current record of
shareholders for the record shareholder holding the dissenter's shares.
Service may also be made otherwise as provided by law.
(4)  The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under
Subsection (2) is plenary and exclusive.  The court may appoint one or more
persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the
question of fair value.  The appraisers have the powers described in the order
appointing them, or in any amendment to it. The dissenters are entitled to the
same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings.
(5)  Each dissenter made a party to the proceeding commenced under Subsection
(2) is entitled to judgment:
(a)  for the amount, if any, by which the court finds that the fair value of
his shares, plus interest, exceeds the amount paid by the corporation pursuant
to Section 16-10a-1325; or
(b)  for the fair value, plus interest, of the dissenter's after-acquired
shares for which the corporation elected to withhold payment under Section
16-10a-1327.
